Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
Captive Cervid Permits

150.725.
Definitions for KRS 150.725 to 150.735.

As used in KRS 150.725 to 150.735:

“Permit” means a permit to hold captive cervids;

“Applicant” means a person or entity who has applied to the department for a permit to hold captive cervids;

“Application” means an application to obtain a permit to hold captive cervids;

“Hold” means to confine to a facility regulated under KRS 150.725 to 150.735 ;

“Import” means to knowingly bring a captive cervid into the state for the purpose of that captive cervid remaining in the state or being slaughtered in the state. “Import” shall not include transporting a captive cervid into the state for the purpose of transporting that captive cervid through the state to a location out of the state. A captive cervid specified in this subsection shall be deemed to be in transit; and

“In transit” means to transport a captive cervid through this Commonwealth by a direct route and in a continuous manner from a location out of state to another location out of state.

History.
Enact. Acts 2006, ch. 159, § 1, effective July 12, 2006; 2009, ch. 62, § 3, effective June 25, 2009; 2010, ch. 158, § 9, effective July 15, 2010.

150.730.
Permits to hold captive cervids — Amendments to existing holding and fencing requirements — Duties of department.

Within sixty (60) days of July 12, 2006, the Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources shall promulgate administrative regulations amending existing requirements for a permit to hold captive cervids in accordance with the provisions of KRS 150.725 to 150.735. All other fencing and holding requirements specified in existing administrative regulation for a permit to hold captive cervids adopted on January 5, 2004, shall not be amended in a manner that is in conflict with KRS 150.725 to 150.735 or that increases the stringency of those requirements, except when as ordered by the state veterinarian for disease control and as provided by law or in administrative regulations for the Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources to control emergency conditions that detrimentally affect wildlife.

The department shall have thirty (30) days from the date it receives a completed application to either issue or deny captive permits for propagation and taking of captive cervids by any legal hunting or slaughter methods. If an application demonstrates that the applicant complies with the statutory and administrative requirements for a permit and the applicant removes all wild cervids from the facility, the department shall issue the permit.

History.
Enact. Acts 2006, ch. 159, § 2, effective July 12, 2006.

150.735.
Placement of primary containment fence — Expansion of captive cervid facility — Transfer of permits — Violation of captive cervid law or regulation — Rights and potential penalties.

An applicant may place his or her primary containment fence on the property line. The department shall not require applicants to set primary containment fences any distance away from the property line.

Any person who operates a captive cervid facility in accordance with this chapter may petition the department at any time to expand his or her captive cervid facility, provided the expansion is adjacent and connected to his or her existing facility and continues to comply with all applicable statutes and regulations.

A lawful permit for an existing captive cervid facility may be transferred, along with any related benefits, rights, responsibilities, and liabilities, to any person who purchases or otherwise takes ownership of the land area on which the captive cervid facility exists. Within thirty (30) days of the date of any transfer of permits, the party transferring the permit shall notify the department of the following:

Name and address of the party to which the permit is to be transferred;

Permit number;

Deed indicating change of land ownership; and

Any additional information the department deems necessary.

If any person holding captive cervids is determined in violation of Kentucky statute or administrative regulation pertaining to the holding of those cervids, then that person shall have sixty (60) days from when the violation was identified to come into compliance. The permit holder has the following rights and potential penalties during the sixty (60) day period:

During the sixty (60) day period, the permit holder may continue to harvest, sell, or slaughter cervids unless the permit has been suspended in accordance with administrative regulations promulgated by the department;

Failure to come into compliance within sixty (60) days of the notice of violation may result in a citation and cause the captive cervids to be immediately seized by the department or the permit to be suspended; and

The individual whose cervids were seized or whose permit was suspended under paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection may request an administrative hearing pursuant to KRS Chapter 13B within thirty (30) days of the issuance of a citation or suspension of the permit and may appeal the final decision to Franklin Circuit Court in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B. Pending the final outcome from all appeals, the seized cervids may be disposed of by the department without compensation to the owner.

History.
Enact. Acts 2006, ch. 159, § 3, effective July 12, 2006; 2009, ch. 62, § 4, effective June 25, 2009.

150.740.
Ban on live Cervidae importation except under certain conditions — Penalties — Reports on chronic wasting disease to be submitted to Interim Joint Committees annually — Authority of department to seize captive cervids — Hearing — Appeal.

There shall be a ban on the importation of live members of the animal family Cervidae into the Commonwealth that have not been subject to a program of surveillance and identification for cervid chronic wasting disease (CWD) that meets or exceeds:

The requirements of the Kentucky Cervid CWD Surveillance and Identification (CCWDSI) Program set forth in this section and in administrative regulations promulgated by the Kentucky Department of Agriculture; and

Any other health requirements as regulated by the Kentucky Department of Agriculture or the United States Department of Agriculture for cervids.

The Kentucky Department of Agriculture shall be responsible for authorizing importation of the members of the animal family Cervidae into the Commonwealth that have been subject to a program of surveillance and identification for cervid CWD that meets or exceeds:

The requirements of the Kentucky CCWDSI Program set forth in this section and in administrative regulations promulgated by the Kentucky Department of Agriculture; and

Any other health requirements as regulated by the Kentucky Department of Agriculture or the United States Department of Agriculture for cervids.

Members of the animal family Cervidae shall not be eligible for importation into the Commonwealth unless the program of surveillance and identification for cervid CWD to which they have been subject:

Has been certified by the exporting state’s state veterinarian or agency having jurisdiction over that state’s surveillance and identification program;

Has been approved by the Kentucky state veterinarian as meeting or exceeding the standards imposed under the Kentucky CCWDSI Program; and

Meets, at minimum, the following requirements:

The program shall require cervid owners to obtain identification and laboratory diagnosis from brain tissue as directed by the exporting state’s state veterinarian or agency with jurisdiction for cervids twelve (12) months of age or greater that:

Display clinical signs of CWD;

Die, including deaths by slaughter or by hunting, including hunting on hunting preserves; or

Are ill or injured regardless of whether the illness or injury results in death; and

The program shall require cervid owners to obtain cervids from herds that have been monitored for at least five (5) years and that have complied with the standards contained in the Kentucky CCWDSI Program.

Cervids originating from a state that has reported a confirmed case of CWD in wild or captive cervids shall not be imported into Kentucky until The United States Department of Agriculture approves:

Regulations that allow importation from those states; and

A live test for CWD that is available for live testing of cervids.

Importation of members of the animal family Cervidae into the Commonwealth shall be consistent with this section and with administrative regulations promulgated by the Kentucky Department of Agriculture in cooperation with the Kentucky Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources.

A person shall be guilty of a Class D felony upon conviction for violating this section. Upon conviction of a second violation of this section and in addition to all other penalties, a person shall be permanently ineligible for renewal of a captive cervid permit. On or before November 1 of each year, the Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources and the Department of Agriculture, Office of the State Veterinarian, respectively shall issue reports to the Interim Joint Committee on Agriculture and the Interim Joint Committee on Natural Resources and Environment on the status of chronic wasting disease, and the reports may include the status of other animal or wildlife diseases in Kentucky and the United States. The reports shall be used for the purpose of determining the need for modifications to the statutory ban on the importation of cervids into the Commonwealth.

The Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources shall have the authority to immediately, and without compensation to the owner, seize captive cervids that have been imported into the Commonwealth contrary to this section. The individual whose cervids were seized may request an administrative hearing pursuant to KRS Chapter 13B within thirty (30) days of the department’s seizure and may appeal the final decision to Franklin Circuit Court in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B. Pending the final outcome of all appeals, the seized cervids may be disposed of by the department without compensation to the owner.

The department shall have the authority to immediately, and without compensation to the owner, seize and destroy captive cervids that are in the process of being imported into the Commonwealth contrary to this section.

A captive cervid originating from outside the Commonwealth of Kentucky which is in transit, as defined in KRS 150.725 and which is being transported through the Commonwealth to another state or nation of destination shall meet the entry requirements of the state or nation of destination.

A person intending to transport a captive cervid through Kentucky shall, prior to the captive cervid entering Kentucky, obtain a transportation permit from the Office of the State Veterinarian. This permit shall specify that:

A captive cervid being transported through Kentucky shall not remain in Kentucky for more than twenty-four (24) hours from the time of entry and, if this requirement cannot be met once the animal is in Kentucky, the Office of the State Veterinarian shall be contacted to secure a variance to the permit;

A captive cervid being transported through Kentucky shall not leave the transport vehicle while in Kentucky; and

The person transporting the captive cervid through Kentucky shall follow the routes specified in the transport permit, if this requirement cannot be met once the animal is in Kentucky, the Office of the State Veterinarian shall be contacted to secure a variance to the permit.

History.
Enact. Acts 2006, ch. 159, § 4, effective July 12, 2006; 2009, ch. 62, § 5, effective June 25, 2009; 2010, ch. 135, § 1, effective July 15, 2010; 2010, ch. 158, § 10, effective July 15, 2010.